Hawaii statutes.
§5-10 State song. The song "Hawai‘i
Pono‘i" is adopted, established, and designated as the official song of
the State, to be effective for as long as the legislature of the State does not
otherwise provide. [L 1967, c 301, §2; HRS §5-10; am L 1990, c 215, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next